Utah statutes.
32A-5-104 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission and department duties before
granting licenses.
(1) (a)  Before a club license may be granted by the commission, the
department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public hearings for the
purpose of gathering information and making recommendations to the commission
as to whether or not a club license should be granted.
(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations
described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's
determination.
(2)  Before granting a club license, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that:
(i)  the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications and requirements
for making application for a club license as provided by Sections 32A-5-102
and 32A-5-103; and
(ii)  the application is complete;
(b)  determine the type of club license for which the applicant qualifies;
(c)  consider the locality within which the proposed club license outlet is
located including:
(i)  physical characteristics such as:
(A)  condition of the premises;
(B)  square footage; and
(C)  parking availability; and
(ii)  operational factors such as:
(A)  tourist traffic;
(B)   proximity to and density of other state stores, package agencies, and
licensed outlets;
(C)   demographics;
(D)   population to be served; and
(E)   the extent of and proximity to any community location;
(d)  consider the club license management's ability to manage and operate a
club license, including:
(i)  management experience;
(ii)  past retail liquor experience; and
(iii)  the type of management scheme employed by the club licensee;
(e)  consider the nature or type of club operations of the proposed club
licensee, including:
(i)  the type of menu items offered and emphasized;
(ii)  the hours of operation;
(iii)  the seating capacity of the premises; and
(iv)  the gross sales of food items; and
(f)  consider any other factor or circumstance the commission considers
necessary.
